Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.125

Academic interns.

(1) An "academic intern" includes any student enrolled in an accredited college funeral service education program who is serving his or her three-month internship at a participating Washington state funeral establishment as required for graduation from the funeral service education program.

(2) Academic interns shall serve their internship in accordance with the guidelines established by the funeral service education program.

(3) Academic interns shall register with the director at the beginning of the academic internship on an application form prescribed by the board. The academic internship may not exceed a period of three months. No fee is required for registration as an academic intern.

[ 2005 c 365 s 8.]